Utah statutes.
20A-15-104.   Ballot -- Form -- Manner of marking and voting.

(1)  The requirements of this section govern the form of the ballot and the specific procedures for electing delegates to the ratification convention.

(2)  Each county clerk shall ensure that the ballot to select delegates to the ratification convention:

(a)  is separate from and printed on different color stock than any other ballot to be used at the same election;

(b)  contains the following information in this order:

(i)  the text of the proposed amendment;

(ii)  instructions to the voter;

(iii)  three perpendicular columns of equal width;

(iv)  at the head of the first perpendicular column, in plain type, the words "For Ratification of Proposed Change in Constitution of the United States";

(v)  at the head of the second perpendicular column, in plain type, the words "Against Ratification of Proposed Change in Constitution of the United States";

(vi)  no heading or names at the head of the third perpendicular column;

(vii)  in the column headed "For Ratification of Proposed Change in Constitution of the United States," the names of the nominees nominated as in favor of ratification;

(viii)  in the column headed "Against Ratification of Proposed Change in Constitution of the United States," the names of the nominees nominated as against ratification; and

(ix)  in the column without heading, spaces permitting the voter to write in other names; and

(c)  is arranged so that the voter may, by making a single mark, vote for the entire group of nominees whose names are contained in any column.

(3)  Each county clerk shall ensure that the ballot to select delegates to the ratification convention is in substantially the following form:

"OFFICIAL BALLOT for delegates to convention to ratify or reject proposed amendment to the Constitution of the United States. The Congress has proposed an amendment to the Constitution of the United States that provides: (insert here the text of the proposed amendment).

The Congress has also directed that the proposed amendment be ratified by conventions in the states.

INSTRUCTIONS TO VOTERS

Do not vote for more than 21.

To vote for all candidates in favor of ratification, or for all candidates against ratification, make a cross-mark in the CIRCLE at the head of the list of candidates for whom you wish to vote. If you do this, make no other mark.

To vote for an individual candidate, make a cross-mark in the SQUARE immediately adjacent to the name.

To vote for a person other than candidates listed on the ballot, write in the person's name in blank column.

For ratification of proposed change in Constitution of the United States.

(Name of Candidate) ____________________________________________

Against ratification of proposed change in Constitution of the United States.

(Name of Candidate) ____________________________________________"

(4)  If the election of delegates to the ratification convention is held at the same time as the regular general election, the county clerk shall:

(a)  give the same ballot number to a regular general election ballot and a ballot to elect delegates to a ratification convention;

(b)  direct the election judges to:

(i)  hand to each voter the general election ballot and the ratification convention ballot with identical ballot numbers;

(ii)  instruct the voter to mark each ballot and deposit each ballot in the ballot box; and

(iii)  mark any ballot "void" that the voter declines to use and return it to the county clerk.

(5)  Each voter shall indicate his choice by making one or more cross-marks in the appropriate spaces provided on the ballot.



Amended by Chapter 202, 2009 General Session

